Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1706
Massage therapy, defined.

Massage therapy means a health care service involving the physical, mechanical, or electrical manipulation of soft tissue for therapeutic purposes or to enhance wellness and may include the use of oil, salt glows, heat lamps, and hydrotherapy. Massage therapy does not include diagnosis or treatment or use of procedures for which a license to practice medicine or surgery, chiropractic, or podiatry is required nor the use of microwave diathermy, shortwave diathermy, ultrasound, transcutaneous electrical nerve stimulation, electrical stimulation of over thirty-five volts, neurological hyperstimulation, or spinal and joint adjustments.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 613;

Laws 2024, LB78, § 1.